Utah statutes.
55-5a-2.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Blind" means an individual, or class of individuals, whose central
acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or
whose visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is accompanied by a limit to the
field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter
subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees.
(2)  "Division" means the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually
Impaired.
(3)  "Direct labor" means work required for preparation, processing and
packing, other than supervision, administration, inspection and shipping.
